Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-1753
Central credit union; board of directors; credit committee.

At the first annual meeting of a central credit union, the members shall elect a board of directors of not less than nine members and a credit committee of not less than three members. No member of the board shall be a member of the credit committee and no credit union small employee group or affiliated organization shall be represented by more than one member on the board of directors, one member on the credit committee, and one member on the supervisory committee.

Laws 1996, LB 948, § 53.